New Jersey, session 221, A4791.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 18 of P.L.1975, c.291 (40:55D-27) is amended to read as follows: 18.  a.  After the appointment of a planning board, the mayor may appoint one or more persons as a citizens' advisory committee to assist or collaborate with the planning board in its duties, but such person or persons shall have no power to vote or take other action required of the board.  Such person or persons shall serve at the pleasure of the mayor. b.    Whenever the environmental commission has prepared and submitted to the planning board and the board of adjustment an index of the natural resources of the municipality, the planning board or the board of adjustment shall make available to the environmental commission [an informational] a copy of every application for development submitted to either board.  The environmental commission may submit recommendations to the planning board or the board of adjustment on each application for development submitted to either board.  The planning board or board of adjustment, as appropriate, shall review and consider the recommendations submitted, by the environmental commission, on an application for development that is pending before the respective board, and, to the extent possible, shall incorporate the environmental commissions recommendations into the boards decision on the application. Failure of the planning board or board of adjustment to make such [informational] copy available to the environmental commission shall [not] invalidate any hearing or proceeding. (cf: P.L.1977, c.49, s.1) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.